Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1606
Grant money; use.

Grant money may be used by eligible recipients in meeting the special housing needs of individuals including meals, transportation, counseling, housekeeping, care management, and personal emergency response needs.

Laws 1992, LB 1192, § 6.